West Virginia, session 2025, SB215.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 30. SOCIAL WORKERS. §30-30-30. Registration as a Bureau for Children and Families service worker. To be eligible to be registered as a service worker for the Bureau for Children and Families of the Department of Human Services, the applicant must:(1) Submit an application to the board;(2) Be at least 18 years of age;(3) Have a baccalaureate degree; (4) Have obtained employment by the bureau;(5) Satisfy the requirements of the West Virginia Clearance for Access: Registry and Employment Screening Act provided in §16-49-1 et seq. of this code; (6) Satisfy the requirements provided in §30-1-24 of this code; (7) Complete 240 hours of pre-service training developed by the bureau: Provided, That if the applicant has a baccalaureate, master’s, or graduate degree in social work, the applicant must complete 80 hours of pre-service experiential and court-room training developed by the bureau;      (8) Complete 20 hours of board-approved continuing social work education every two years, up to 10 of which may be earned through board-approved online education hours: Provided, That at least two of the hours shall be related to the Code of Ethics adopted by the board, and at least two hours shall be related to social, health, and mental health concerns of veterans and their families; and(9) Pay the application fee.